District of Columbia statutes.
21-2082

Durable power of attorney not affected by incapacity.

All acts done by an attorney in fact pursuant to a durable power of attorney during any period of incapacity of the principal have the same effect and inure to the benefit of and bind the principal and his successors in interest as if the principal were not incapacitated.

Feb. 28, 1987, D.C. Law 6-204, § 2(a), 34 DCR 632
1981 Ed., § 21-2082.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 2 of the Uniform Durable Power of Attorney Act.